Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201519-4029.04
Hearing for expansion of boundaries; city council; duties; protest; effect.

Whenever a hearing is held to expand district boundaries under section 19-4029.02 or 19-4029.03, the city council shall:

(1) Hear all protests and receive evidence for or against the proposed action;

(2) Rule upon all written protests received prior to the close of the hearing, which ruling shall be final; and

(3) Continue the hearing from time to time as the city council may deem necessary.

If a special assessment is to be used, proceedings shall terminate if written protest is made prior to the close of the hearing by the record owners of over fifty percent of the assessable units in the modified district as proposed. If an occupation tax is to be used, proceedings shall terminate if protest is made by users of over fifty percent of space in the modified district as proposed.

Laws 2015, LB168, § 14.
August 30, 2015